Massachusetts, session 194th, H2531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 112A the 
2 following chapter:- 
3  Chapter 112B. Physician Assistant Licensure Compact. 
4  Section 1. In order to strengthen access to medical services, and in recognition of the 
5 advances in the delivery of medical services, the participating states of the physician assistant 
6 licensure compact have allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive process that 
7 complements the existing authority of state licensing boards to license and discipline physician 
8 assistants and seeks to enhance the portability of a license to practice as a physician assistant 
9 while safeguarding the safety of patients. This compact allows medical services to be provided 
10 by physician assistants, via the mutual recognition of the licensee’s qualifying license by other 
11 compact participating states. This compact also adopts the prevailing standard for physician 
12 assistant licensure and affirms that the practice and delivery of medical services by the physician 

2 of 34 13 assistant occurs where the patient is located at the time of the patient encounter, and therefore 
14 requires the physician assistant to be under the jurisdiction of the state licensing board where the 
15 patient is located. State licensing boards that participate in this compact retain the jurisdiction to 
16 impose adverse action against a compact privilege in that state issued to a physician assistant 
17 through the procedures of this compact. The physician assistant licensure compact will alleviate 
18 burdens for military families by allowing active duty military personnel and their spouses to 
19 obtain a compact privilege based on having an unrestricted license in good standing from a 
20 participating state.  
21  Section 2.   
22  As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words shall 
23 have the following meanings:  
24  “Adverse action”, any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted 
25  by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a 
26 physician assistant license or license application or compact privilege such as license denial, 
27 censure, revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, or restriction on the 
28 licensee’s practice. 
29  “Compact privilege”, the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from 
30 another participating state to practice as a physician assistant to provide medical services and 
31 other licensed activity to a patient located in the remote state under the remote state’s laws and 
32 regulations. 

3 of 34 33  “Conviction”, a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a felony or misdemeanor 
34 offense through adjudication or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the charge by the 
35 offender.  
36  “Criminal background check”, the submission of fingerprints or other biometric based 
37 information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal history 
38 record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the state’s criminal history record 
39 repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f). 
40  “Data system”, the repository of information about licensees, including but not limited to 
41 license status and adverse actions, which is created and administered under the terms of this 
42 compact. 
43  “Executive committee”, a group of directors and ex-officio individuals elected or 
44 appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of section 7. 
45  “Impaired practitioner”, a physician assistant whose practice is adversely affected by 
46 health related condition(s) that impact their ability to practice. 
47  “Investigative information”, information, records, or documents received or 
48  generated by a licensing board pursuant to an investigation. 
49  “Jurisprudence requirement”, the assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the laws 
50 and rules governing the practice of a physician assistant in a state. 
51  “License”, current authorization by a state, other than authorization pursuant to a compact 
52 privilege, for a physician assistant to provide medical services, which would be unlawful without 
53 current authorization. 

4 of 34 54  “Licensee”, an individual who holds a license from a state to provide medical services as 
55 a physician assistant. 
56  “Licensing board”, any state entity authorized to license and otherwise regulate physician 
57 assistants. 
58  “Medical services”, health care services provided for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, 
59 cure or relief of a health condition, injury, or disease, as defined by a state’s laws and 
60 regulations. 
61  “Model compact”, the model for the physician assistant licensure compact on file with 
62 the Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by the commission. 
63  “Participating state”, a state that has enacted this compact. 
64  “Physician Assistant” means an individual who is licensed as a physician assistant in a 
65 state. For purposes of this compact, any other title or status adopted by a state to replace the term 
66 “Physician Assistant” shall be deemed synonymous with “physician assistant” and shall confer 
67 the same rights and responsibilities to the licensee under the provisions of this compact at the 
68 time of its enactment. 
69  “Physician Assistant Licensure Compact Commission”, “Compact Commission”, or 
70 “Commission”, the national administrative body created pursuant to subsection (a) of section 7. 
71  “Qualifying license”, an unrestricted license issued by a participating state to provide 
72 medical services as a physician assistant. 
73  “Remote state”, a participating state where a licensee who is not licensed as a physician 
74 assistant is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege. 

5 of 34 75  “Rule”, a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force and effect of law. 
76  “Significant investigative information”, investigative information that a licensing board, 
77 after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for the physician 
78 assistant to respond if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if 
79 proven true, would indicate more than a minor infraction. 
80  “State”, any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States. 
81  Section 3. (a) To participate in this compact, a participating state shall: 
82  (1) license physician assistants; 
83  (2) participate in the compact commission’s data system; 
84  (3) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints against 
85 licensees and license applicants; 
86  (4) notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of this compact and commission 
87 rules, of any adverse action against a licensee or license applicant and the existence of significant 
88 investigative information regarding a licensee or license applicant; 
89  (5) fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a time frame 
90 established by commission rule, by its licensing board receiving the results of a criminal 
91 background check and reporting to the commission whether the license applicant has been 
92 granted a license; 
93  (6) comply with the rules of the compact commission; 

6 of 34 94  (7) Utilize passage of a recognized national exam such as the NCCPA PANCE as a 
95 requirement for PA licensure; and  
96  (8) grant the compact privilege to a holder of a qualifying license in a participating state.  
97  (b) Nothing in this compact shall prohibit a participating state from charging a fee for 
98 granting the compact privilege.  
99  Section 4. (a) To exercise the compact privilege, a licensee must: 
100  (1) have graduated from a physician assistant program accredited by the Accreditation 
101 Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc. or other programs authorized 
102 by commission rule; 
103  (2) hold current certification from the National Commission on Certification of Physician 
104 Assistants; 
105  (3) have no felony or misdemeanor conviction; 
106  (4) have never had a controlled substance license, permit, or registration suspended or 
107 revoked by a state or by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; 
108  (5) have a unique identifier as determined by commission rule; 
109  (6) hold a qualifying license; 
110  (7) have had no revocation of a license or limitation or restriction on any license currently 
111 held due to an adverse action; 

7 of 34 112  (8) if a licensee has had a limitation or restriction on a license or compact privilege due to 
113 an adverse action, two years shall have elapsed from the date on which the license or compact 
114 privilege is no longer limited or restricted due to the adverse action; 
115  (9) if a compact privilege has been revoked or is limited or restricted in a participating 
116 state for conduct that would not be a basis for disciplinary action in a participating state in which 
117 the licensee is practicing or applying to practice under a compact privilege, that participating 
118 state shall have the discretion not to consider such action as an adverse action requiring the 
119 denial or removal of a compact privilege in that state; 
120  (10) notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking the compact privilege in 
121 a remote state; 
122  (11) meet any jurisprudence requirement of a remote state in which the licensee is 
123 seeking to practice under the compact privilege and pay any fees applicable to satisfying the 
124 jurisprudence requirement; and 
125  (12) report to the commission any adverse action taken by a non-participating state within 
126 30 days after the action is taken. 
127  (b) The compact privilege shall be valid until the expiration or revocation of the 
128 qualifying license unless terminated pursuant to an adverse action. The licensee must also 
129 comply with all of the requirements of subsection (a) to maintain the compact privilege in a 
130 remote state. If the participating state takes adverse action against a qualifying license, the 
131 licensee shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state in which the licensee has a compact 
132 privilege until all of the following occur: 

8 of 34 133  (1) the license is no longer limited or restricted; and 
134  (2) 2 years have elapsed from the date on which the license is no longer limited or 
135 restricted due to the adverse action. 
136  (c) Once a restricted or limited license satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) 
137 of subsection (b), the licensee must meet the requirements of subsection (a) to obtain a compact 
138 privilege in any remote state.  
139  (d) For each remote state in which a physician assistant seeks authority to prescribe 
140 controlled substances, the physician assistant shall satisfy all requirements imposed by such state 
141 in granting or renewing such authority.  
142  Section 5. (a) Upon a licensee’s application for a compact privilege, the licensee shall 
143 identify to the commission the participating state from which the licensee is applying, in 
144 accordance with applicable rules adopted by the commission, and subject to the following 
145 requirements: 
146  (1) when applying for a compact privilege, the licensee shall provide the commission 
147 with the address of the licensee’s primary residence and thereafter shall immediately report to the 
148 commission any change in the address of the licensee’s primary residence; and 
149  (2) when applying for a compact privilege, the licensee shall consent to accept service of 
150 process by mail at the licensee’s primary residence on file with the commission with respect to 
151 any action brought against the licensee by the commission or a participating state, including a 
152 subpoena, with respect to any action brought or investigation conducted by the commission or a 
153 participating state. 

9 of 34 154  Section 6. (a) A participating state in which a licensee is licensed shall have exclusive 
155 power to impose adverse action against the qualifying license issued by that participating state. 
156  (b) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the 
157 authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to do all of the following: 
158  (1) take adverse action against a physician assistant’s compact privilege within that state 
159 to remove a licensee’s compact privilege or take other action necessary under applicable law to 
160 protect the health and safety of its citizens; 
161  (2) issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and 
162 testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing 
163 board in a participating state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 
164 evidence from another participating state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of 
165 competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to 
166 subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness 
167 fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which 
168 the witnesses or evidence are located. 
169  (3) notwithstanding paragraph (2), subpoenas may not be issued by a participating state to 
170 gather evidence of conduct in another state that is lawful in that other state for the purpose of 
171 taking adverse action against a licensee’s compact privilege or application for a compact 
172 privilege in that participating state; and 
173  (4) nothing in this compact authorizes a participating state to impose discipline against a 
174 physician assistant’s compact privilege or to deny an application for a compact privilege in that 
175 participating state for the individual’s otherwise lawful practice in another state. 

10 of 34 176  (c) For purposes of taking adverse action, the participating state which issued the 
177 qualifying license shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from any 
178 other participating state as it would if the conduct had occurred within the participating state 
179 which issued the qualifying license. In so doing, that participating state shall apply its own state 
180 laws to determine appropriate action. 
181  (d) A participating state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the 
182 affected physician assistant the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any 
183 adverse action taken against that physician assistant. 
184  (e) A participating state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of a remote 
185 state, provided that the participating state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse 
186 action. 
187  (f) (1) In addition to the authority granted to a participating state by its respective state 
188 physician assistant laws and regulations or other applicable state law, any participating state may 
189 participate with other participating states in joint investigations of licensees. 
190  (2) Participating states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in 
191 furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under this compact. 
192  (g) If an adverse action is taken against a physician assistant’s qualifying license, the 
193 physician assistant’s compact privilege in all remote states shall be deactivated until 2 years have 
194 elapsed after all restrictions have been removed from the state license. All disciplinary orders by 
195 the participating state which issued the qualifying license that impose adverse action against a 
196 physician assistant’s license shall include a statement that the physician assistant’s compact 
197 privilege is deactivated in all participating states during the pendency of the order. 

11 of 34 198  (h) If any participating state takes adverse action, it promptly shall notify the 
199 administrator of the data system. 
200  Section 7. (a) The participating states hereby establish a joint government agency and 
201 national administrative body known as the physician assistant licensure compact commission. 
202 The commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and not an 
203 instrumentality of any 1 state. The commission shall come into existence on or after the effective 
204 date of the compact as set forth in subsection (a) of section 11. 
205  (b)(1) Each participating state shall have and be limited to 1 delegate selected by that 
206 participating state’s licensing board or, if the state has more than one licensing board, selected 
207 collectively by the participating state’s licensing boards. 
208  (2) The delegate shall be: 
209  (i) a current physician assistant, physician or public member of a licensing board or 
210 physician assistant council/committee; or 
211  (ii) an administrator of a licensing board. 
212  (3) Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the laws of 
213 the state from which the delegate is appointed. 
214  (4) The participating state licensing board shall fill any vacancy occurring in the 
215 commission within 60 days.  
216  (5) Each delegate shall be entitled to 1 vote on all matters voted on by the commission 
217 and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the 
218 commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. 

12 of 34 219 The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telecommunications, video 
220 conference, or other means of communication. 
221  (6) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional 
222 meetings shall be held as set forth in this compact and the bylaws.  
223  (7) The commission shall establish by rule a term of office for delegates. 
224  (c) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: 
225  (1) establish a code of ethics for the commission; 
226  (2) establish the fiscal year of the commission; 
227  (3) establish fees; 
228  (4) establish bylaws; 
229  (5) maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws; 
230  (6) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and 
231 the bylaws; 
232  (7) promulgate rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of 
233 this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all 
234 participating states;  
235  (8) bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, 
236 provided that the standing of any state licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law 
237 shall not be affected; 

13 of 34 238  (9) purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; 
239  (10) borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, 
240 employees of a participating state; 
241  (11) hire employees and engage contractors, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, 
242 define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this 
243 compact, and establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of 
244 interest, qualifications of personnel,and other related personnel matters; 
245  (12) accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, 
246 materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the 
247 commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; 
248  (13) lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own, hold, 
249 improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided, that at all times the commission 
250 shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; 
251  (14) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of 
252 any property real, personal, or mixed;  
253  (15) establish a budget and make expenditures; 
254  (16) borrow money; 
255  (17) appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members, state 
256 regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other 
257 interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws; 

14 of 34 258  (18) provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement 
259 agencies; 
260  (19) elect a chair, vice chair, secretary and treasurer and such other officers of the 
261 commission as provided in the commission’s bylaws; 
262  (20) reserve for itself, in addition to those reserved exclusively to the commission under 
263 the compact, powers that the executive committee may not exercise; 
264  (21) approve or disapprove a state’s participation in the compact based upon its 
265 determination as to whether the state’s compact legislation departs in a material manner from the 
266 model compact language; 
267  (22) prepare and provide to the participating states an annual report; and  
268  (23) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the 
269 purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of physician assistant licensure and 
270 practice. 
271  (d) (1) All meetings of the commission that are not closed pursuant to this subsection 
272 shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the commission’s 
273 website at least 30 days prior to the public meeting. 
274  (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subsection (d), the commission may convene a 
275 public meeting by providing at least 24 hours prior notice on the commission’s website, and any 
276 other means as provided in the commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with 
277 notice of proposed rulemaking under subsection (I) of section 9. 

15 of 34 278  (3) The commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting or non-public part of a 
279 public meeting to receive legal advice or to discuss: 
280  (i) non-compliance of a participating state with its obligations under this compact; 
281  (ii) the employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures 
282 related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission’s internal personnel 
283 practices and procedures; 
284  (iii) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation; 
285  (iv) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real 
286 estate; 
287  (v) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; 
288  (vi) disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or 
289 confidential; 
290  (vii) disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a 
291 clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; 
292  (viii) disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; 
293  (ix) disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf 
294 of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation 
295 or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this compact; 
296  (x) legal advice; or 

16 of 34 297  (xi) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or participating states’ 
298 statutes.  
299  (4) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the chair of 
300 the meeting or the chair’s designee shall certify that the meeting or portion of the meeting may 
301 be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. 
302  (5) The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters 
303 discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, including 
304 a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action 
305 shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain 
306 under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of 
307 competent jurisdiction.  
308  (e)(1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses 
309 of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities. 
310  (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations, and 
311 grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services. 
312  (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each 
313 participating state and may impose compact privilege fees on licensees of participating states to 
314 whom a compact privilege is granted to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the 
315 commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as 
316 approved by the commission each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The 
317 aggregate annual assessment amount levied on participating states shall be allocated based upon 
318 a formula to be determined by commission rule. 

17 of 34 319  (i) A compact privilege expires when the licensee’s qualifying license in the participating 
320 state from which the licensee applied for the compact privilege expires.  
321  (ii) If the licensee terminates the qualifying license through which the licensee applied for 
322 the compact privilege before its scheduled expiration, and the licensee has a qualifying license in 
323 another participating state, the licensee shall inform the commission that it is changing to that 
324 participating state the participating state through which it applies for a compact privilege and pay 
325 to the commission any compact privilege fee required by commission rule. 
326  (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds 
327 adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the participating 
328 states, except by and with the authority of the participating state. 
329  (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The 
330 receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the financial review and 
331 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds 
332 handled by the commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or 
333 licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and 
334 become part of the annual report of the commission.  
335  (f) (1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission 
336 according to the terms of this compact and commission rules. 
337  (2) The executive committee shall be composed of 9 members: 
338  (i) 7 voting members who are elected by the commission from the current membership of 
339 the commission; 

18 of 34 340  (ii) 1 ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national physician assistant 
341 professional association; and 
342  (iii) 1 ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national physician assistant 
343 certification organization. 
344  (3) The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective organizations. 
345  (4) The commission may remove any member of the executive committee as provided in 
346 its bylaws. 
347  (5) The executive committee shall meet at least annually. 
348  (6) The executive committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities: 
349  (i) recommend to the commission changes to the commission’s rules or bylaws, changes 
350 to this compact legislation, fees to be paid by compact participating states such as annual dues, 
351 and any commission compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege; 
352  (ii) ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or 
353 otherwise; 
354  (iii) prepare and recommend the budget; 
355  (iv) maintain financial records on behalf of the commission; 
356  (v) monitor compact compliance of participating states and provide compliance reports to 
357 the commission; 
358  (vi) establish additional committees as necessary; 

19 of 34 359  (vii) exercise the powers and duties of the commission during the interim between 
360 commission meetings, except for issuing proposed rulemaking or adopting commission rules or 
361 bylaws, or exercising any other powers and duties exclusively reserved to the commission by the  
362 commission’s rules; and 
363  (viii) perform other duties as provided in the commission’s rules or bylaws. 
364  (7) All meetings of the executive committee at which it votes or plans to vote on matters 
365 in exercising the powers and duties of the commission shall be open to the public and public 
366 notice of such meetings shall be given as public meetings of the commission are given.  
367  (8) The executive committee may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the same 
368 reasons that the commission may convene in a non-public meeting as set forth in paragraph (3) 
369 of subsection (d) of section 7 and shall announce the closed meeting as the commission is 
370 required to under paragraph (4) of said subsection (d) and keep minutes of the closed meeting as 
371 the commission is required to under paragraph (5) of said subsection (d). 
372  (g)(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the 
373 commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official 
374 capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability 
375 caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the 
376 person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the 
377 scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this 
378 paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, 
379 loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 

20 of 34 380 The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission shall not in any way compromise 
381 or limit the immunity granted hereunder. 
382  (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and 
383 representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any 
384 actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission 
385 employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the person 
386 against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope 
387 of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be 
388 construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and 
389 provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that 
390 person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. 
391  (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive 
392 director, employee, and representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or 
393 judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission 
394 that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that 
395 such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission 
396 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission 
397 did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.  
398  (4) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be 
399 brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of 
400 the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses in any 
401 proceedings as authorized by commission rules. 

21 of 34 402  (5) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for 
403 professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable 
404 state laws. 
405  (6) Nothing herein shall be construed to designate the venue or jurisdiction to bring 
406 actions for alleged acts of malpractice, professional misconduct, negligence, or other such civil 
407 action pertaining to the practice of a physician assistant. All such matters shall be determined 
408 exclusively by state law other than this compact. 
409  (7) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a 
410 participating state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to 
411 antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or 
412 anticompetitive law or regulation. 
413  (8) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by 
414 the participating states or by the commission.  
415  Section 8. (a) The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, 
416 operation, and utilization of a coordinated data and reporting system containing licensure, 
417 adverse action, and the reporting of the existence of significant investigative information on all 
418 licensed physician assistants and applicants denied a license in participating states. 
419  (b) Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, a participating state shall submit 
420 a uniform data set to the data system on all physician assistants to whom this compact is 
421 applicable, utilizing a unique identifier as required by the rules of the commission, including: 
422  (1) identifying information; 

22 of 34 423  (2) licensure data; 
424  (3) adverse actions against a license or compact privilege; 
425  (4) any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such denial, 
426 excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law; 
427  (5) the existence of significant investigative information; and 
428  (6) other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined 
429 by the rules of the commission.  
430  (c) Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any participating state 
431 shall only be available to other participating states. 
432  (d) The commission shall promptly notify all participating states of any adverse action 
433 taken against a licensee or an individual applying for a license that has been reported to it. This 
434 adverse action information shall be available to any other participating state. 
435  (e) Participating states contributing information to the data system may, in accordance 
436 with state or federal law, designate information that may not be shared with the public without 
437 the express permission of the contributing state. Notwithstanding any such designation, such 
438 information shall be reported to the commission through the data system. 
439  (f) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant 
440 to federal law or the laws of the participating state contributing the information shall be removed 
441 from the data system upon reporting of such by the participating state to the commission. 

23 of 34 442  (g) The records and information provided to a participating state pursuant to this compact 
443 or through the data system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute 
444 the authenticated business records of the commission, and shall be entitled to any associated 
445 hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative 
446  proceedings in a participating state. 
447  Section 9. (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the 
448 criteria in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Commission rules shall become binding 
449 as of the date specified by the commission for each rule.  
450  (b) The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and 
451 efficiently implement and administer this compact and achieve its purposes. A commission rule 
452 shall be invalid and not have  force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that 
453 the rule is invalid because the commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is 
454 beyond the scope of the purposes of this compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based 
455 upon another applicable standard of review.  
456  (c) The rules of the commission shall have the force of law in each participating state, 
457 provided however that where the rules of the commission conflict with the laws of the 
458 participating state that establish the medical services a physician assistant may perform in the 
459 participating state, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the commission shall 
460 be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.  
461  (d) If a majority of the legislatures of the participating states rejects a commission rule, 
462 by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this compact within 4 

24 of 34 463 years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in 
464 any participating state or to any state applying to participate in the compact.  
465  (e) Commission rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. 
466  (f) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at 
467 least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the 
468 commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:  
469  (1) on the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform;   
470  (2) to persons who have requested notice of the commission’s notices of proposed 
471 rulemaking; and  
472  (3) in such other ways as the commission may by rule specify.  
473  (g) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:  
474  (1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing on the proposed rule and the 
475 proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the proposed rule will be considered 
476 and voted upon;  
477  (2) the text of the proposed rule and the reason for the proposed rule;  
478  (3) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person and the date 
479 by which written comments must be received; and  
480  (4) the manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their 
481 intention to attend the public hearing or provide any written comments.  

25 of 34 482  (h) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit 
483 written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. 
484  (i) If the hearing is to be held via electronic means, the commission shall publish the 
485 mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.  
486  (1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall as directed in the notice of 
487 proposed rulemaking, not less than 5 business days before the scheduled date of the hearing, 
488 notify the commission of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing.  
489  (2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to 
490 comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.  
491  (3) All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording and the written comments, 
492 data, facts, opinions, and arguments received in response to the proposed rulemaking shall be 
493 made available to a person upon request.  
494  (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each 
495 proposed rule. Proposed rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings 
496 required by this section.  
497  (j) Following the public hearing the commission shall consider all written and oral 
498 comments timely received.  
499  (k) The commission shall, by majority vote of all delegates, take final action on the 
500 proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if adopted, based on the 
501 rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.  
502  (1) If adopted, the rule shall be posted on the commission’s website.  

26 of 34 503  (2) The commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not 
504 enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.  
505  (3) The commission shall provide on its website an explanation of the reasons for 
506 substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not 
507 made that were recommended by commenters.  
508  (4) The commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule. Except for an 
509 emergency as provided in subsection (l), the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 
510 days after the commission issued the notice that it adopted the rule.  
511  (l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt 
512 an emergency rule with 24 hours prior notice, without the opportunity for comment, or hearing, 
513 provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall 
514 be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days 
515 after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one 
516 that must be adopted immediately by the commission in order to:  
517  (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;  
518  (2) prevent a loss of commission or participating state funds;  
519  (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a commission rule that is established by 
520 federal law or rule; or  
521  (4) protect public health and safety.  
522  (m) The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions 
523 to a previously adopted commission rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors 

27 of 34 524 in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be 
525 posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any 
526 person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds 
527 that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made as set forth in 
528 the notice of revisions and delivered to the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no 
529 challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is 
530 challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission.  
531  (n) No participating state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.   
532  Section 10. (a)(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each 
533 participating state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to 
534 implement the compact.  
535  (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be 
536 brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of 
537 the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the 
538 extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing 
539 herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for 
540 professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.  
541  (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding 
542 regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact or the commission’s rules and shall 
543 have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the 
544 commission with service of process shall render a judgment or order in such proceeding void as 
545 to the commission, this compact, or commission rules.  

28 of 34 546  (b) (1) If the commission determines that a participating state has defaulted in the 
547 performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the commission rules, the 
548 commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state and other participating states. The 
549 notice shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default and any other action 
550 that the commission may take and shall offer remedial training and specific technical assistance 
551 regarding the default.  
552  (2) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated 
553 from this compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the participating 
554 states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact upon such state may be 
555 terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 
556 offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.  
557  (3) Termination of participation in this compact shall be imposed only after all other 
558 means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate 
559 shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the 
560 defaulting state’s legislature, and to the licensing board of each of the participating states.   
561  (4) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and 
562 liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend 
563 beyond the effective date of termination.  
564  (5) The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default 
565 or that has been terminated from this compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the 
566 commission and the defaulting state.  

29 of 34 567  (6) The defaulting state may appeal its termination from the compact by the commission 
568 by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where 
569 the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of 
570 such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.  
571  (7) Upon the termination of a state’s participation in the compact, the state shall 
572 immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination:  
573  (i) licensees who have been granted a compact privilege in that state shall retain the 
574 compact privilege for 180 days following the effective date of such termination.  
575  (ii) licensees who are licensed in that state who have been granted a compact privilege in 
576 a participating state shall retain the compact privilege for 180 days unless the licensee also has a 
577 qualifying license in a participating state or obtains a qualifying license in a participating state 
578 before the 180-day period ends, in which case the compact privilege shall continue.  
579  (c) (1) Upon request by a participating state, the commission shall attempt to resolve 
580 disputes related to this compact that arise among participating states and between participating 
581 and non-participating states.  
582  (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding 
583 dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.  
584  (d)(1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the 
585 provisions of this compact and rules of the commission.  
586  (2) If compliance is not secured after all means to secure compliance have been 
587 exhausted, by majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States 

30 of 34 588 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its 
589 principal offices, against a participating state in default to enforce compliance with the 
590 provisions of this compact and the commission’s promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief 
591 sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 
592 necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 
593 attorney’s fees.  
594  (3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The 
595 commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.  
596  (e)(1) A participating state may initiate legal action against the commission in the U.S. 
597 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its 
598 principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its rules. The 
599 relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 
600 necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 
601 attorney’s fees.  
602  (2) No person other than a participating state shall enforce this compact against the 
603 commission.  
604  Section 11. (a) This compact shall come into effect on the date on which this compact 
605 statute is enacted into law in the seventh participating state.  
606  (1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene and 
607 review the enactment of each of the states that enacted the compact prior to the commission 
608 convening referred to as charter participating states, to determine if the statute enacted by each 
609 such charter participating state is materially different than the model compact.  

31 of 34 610  (i) a charter participating state whose enactment is found to be materially different from 
611 the model compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in  subsection (b) of section 
612 10.   
613  (ii) if any participating state later withdraws from the compact or its participation is 
614 terminated, the commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even 
615 if the number of participating states should be less than seven. Participating states enacting the 
616 compact subsequent to the commission convening shall be subject to the process set forth in 
617 paragraph (21) of subsection (c) of section 7 to determine if their enactments are materially 
618 different from the model compact and whether they qualify for participation in the compact.  
619  (2) Participating states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven initial charter 
620 participating states shall be subject to the process set forth in paragraph (21) of subsection (c) of 
621 section 7 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model compact and 
622 whether they qualify for participation in the compact.  
623  (3) All actions taken for the benefit of the commission or in furtherance of the purposes 
624 of the administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the commission 
625 coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the commission unless specifically 
626 repudiated by the commission.  
627  (b) Any state that joins this compact shall be subject to the commission’s rules and 
628 bylaws as they exist on the date on which this compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that 
629 has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the 
630 day this compact becomes law in that state.  

32 of 34 631  (c) Any participating state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute 
632 repealing the same.  
633  (1) A participating state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment 
634 of the repealing statute. During this 180 day-period, all compact privileges that were in effect in 
635 the withdrawing state and were granted to licensees licensed in the withdrawing state shall 
636 remain in effect. If any licensee licensed in the withdrawing state is also licensed in another 
637 participating state or obtains a license in another participating state within the 180 days, the 
638 licensee’s compact privileges in other participating states shall not be affected by the passage of 
639 the 180 days.  
640  (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the state licensing board of 
641 the withdrawing state to comply with the investigative, and adverse action reporting 
642 requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.  
643  (3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing a state from this compact, the state shall 
644 immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Such 
645 withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a 
646 minimum of 180days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.  
647  (d) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any 
648 physician assistant licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between participating 
649 states and between a participating state and non-participating state that does not conflict with the 
650 provisions of this compact.  
651  (e) This compact may be amended by the participating states. No amendment to this 
652 compact shall become effective and binding upon any participating state until it is enacted 

33 of 34 653 materially in the same manner into the laws of all participating states as determined by the 
654 commission.  
655  Section 12. (a) This compact and the commission’s rulemaking authority shall be 
656 liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of 
657 the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of 
658 rules shall not be construed to limit the commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those 
659 purposes.  
660  (b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence 
661 or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the 
662 constitution of any participating state, a state seeking participation in the compact, or of the 
663 United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is 
664 held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of 
665 this compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or 
666 circumstance shall not be affected thereby.   
667  (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or this subsection, the commission may deny a state’s 
668 participation in the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of subsection (b) of section 
669 (10), terminate a participating state’s participation in the compact, if it determines that a 
670 constitutional requirement of a participating state is, or would be with respect to a state seeking 
671 to participate in the compact, a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact 
672 shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state, the compact shall 
673 remain in full force and effect as to the remaining participating states and in full force and effect 
674 as to the participating state affected as to all severable matters.  

34 of 34 675  Section 13. (a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a 
676 participating state that is not inconsistent with this compact.  
677  (b) Any laws in a participating state in conflict with this compact are superseded to the 
678 extent of the conflict.  
679  (c) All agreements between the commission and the participating states are binding in 
680 accordance with their terms.